Hawaii statutes.
§166-3 Authority to plan, develop, and
manage agricultural parks. The department of agriculture shall plan,
develop, and manage agricultural parks in accordance with this chapter, on
public lands set aside by the governor for use as agricultural parks pursuant
to section 171-11; on other lands with the approval of the board of agriculture
as may be subject to a partnership agreement pursuant to sections 166-4 and
166-5; and on lands acquired by the department by way of foreclosure, voluntary
surrender, or otherwise pursuant to section 155-4(11). [L 1986, c 222, pt of
§1; am L 1993, c 102, §1; am L 1998, c 11, §14]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next